Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.232.005

Finding—Intent.

(1) Under Article IX of the Washington state Constitution, all children are entitled to an opportunity to receive a basic education. Although the state must assure that students in public schools have opportunities to participate in the instructional program of basic education, there is no obligation for either the state or school districts to provide that instruction using a particular delivery method or through a particular program.

(2) The legislature finds ample evidence of the need to examine and reconsider policies under which alternative learning that occurs outside the classroom using an individual student learning plan may be considered equivalent to full-time attendance in school, including for funding purposes. Previous legislative studies have raised questions about financial practices and accountability in alternative learning experience courses. Since 2005, there has been significant enrollment growth in alternative learning experience online courses, with evidence of unexpected financial impact when large numbers of nonresident students enroll in courses. Based on this evidence, there is a rational basis on which to conclude that there are different costs associated with providing courses not primarily based on full-time, daily contact between teachers and students and not primarily occurring on-site in a classroom.

(3) For these reasons, the legislature intends to allow for continuing review and revision of the way in which state funding allocations are used to support alternative learning experience courses.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 18 s 501; 2011 1st sp.s. c 34 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—Enforcement of laws protecting health and safety—2013 2nd sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28A.600.022.